Ohio, session 136, HB778.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3735.67, 5709.40, 5709.41, 5709.73, and 5709.78 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 3735.67. (A) The Subject to division (G) of this section, the owner of real property located in a community reinvestment area and eligible for exemption from taxation under a resolution adopted pursuant to section 3735.66 of the Revised Code may file an application for an exemption from real property taxation of a percentage of the assessed valuation of a new structure, or of the increased assessed valuation of an existing structure after remodeling began, if the new structure or remodeling is completed after the effective date of the resolution adopted pursuant to section 3735.66 of the Revised Code. The application shall be filed with the housing officer designated for the community reinvestment area in which the property is located. If any part of the new structure or remodeled structure that would be exempted is of real property to be used for commercial or industrial purposes, the legislative authority and the owner of the property shall enter into a written agreement pursuant to section 3735.671 of the Revised Code prior to commencement of construction or remodeling; if such an agreement is subject to approval by the board of education of the school district within the territory of which the property is or will be located, the agreement shall not be formally approved by the legislative authority until the board of education approves the agreement in the manner prescribed by that section. If a structure is already subject to a written agreement pursuant to section 3735.671 of the Revised Code, is on the site of a proposed megaproject, and is expected to be owned or occupied by a megaproject operator as defined in division (A)(12) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code, or is not situated on the site of a proposed megaproject but is expected to be owned or occupied by a megaproject supplier that meets the requirements described in division (A)(13)(b) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code, the legislative authority may amend the agreement to cause the exemption for the structure to continue for a maximum amended term not exceeding thirty years by following the process for approving an agreement described in section 3735.671 of the Revised Code. (B) The housing officer shall verify the construction of the new structure or the cost of the remodeling of the existing structure and the facts asserted in the application. The housing officer shall determine whether the construction or remodeling meets the requirements for an exemption under this section. In cases involving a structure of historical or architectural significance, the housing officer shall not determine whether the remodeling meets the requirements for a tax exemption unless the appropriateness of the remodeling has been certified, in writing, by the society, association, agency, or legislative authority that has designated the structure or by any organization or person authorized, in writing, by such society, association, agency, or legislative authority to certify the appropriateness of the remodeling. (C) If the construction or remodeling meets the requirements for exemption, the housing officer shall forward the application to the county auditor with a certification as to the division of this section under which the exemption is granted, and the period and percentage of the exemption as determined by the legislative authority pursuant to that division. If the construction or remodeling is of commercial or industrial property and the legislative authority is not required to certify a copy of a resolution under section 3735.671 of the Revised Code, the housing officer shall comply with the notice requirements prescribed under section 5709.83 of the Revised Code, unless the board has adopted a resolution under that section waiving its right to receive such a notice. (D) Except as provided in division (F) of this section, the tax exemption shall first apply in the year the construction or remodeling would first be taxable but for this section. In the case of remodeling that qualifies for exemption, a percentage, not to exceed one hundred per cent, of the increased assessed valuation of an existing structure after remodeling began shall be exempted from real property taxation. In the case of construction of a structure that qualifies for exemption, a percentage, not to exceed one hundred per cent, of the assessed value of the structure shall be exempted from real property taxation. In either case, the percentage shall be the percentage set forth in the agreement if the structure or remodeling is to be used for commercial or industrial purposes, or the percentage set forth in the resolution describing the community reinvestment area if the structure or remodeling is to be used for residential purposes. The construction of new structures and the remodeling of existing structures are hereby declared to be a public purpose for which exemptions from real property taxation may be granted for the following periods: (1) For every dwelling and commercial or industrial properties, located within the same community reinvestment area, upon which the cost of remodeling is at least two thousand five hundred dollars in the case of a dwelling containing not more than two family units or at least five thousand dollars in the case of all other property, a period to be determined by the legislative authority adopting the resolution, but not exceeding fifteen years. The period of exemption for a dwelling described in division (D)(1) of this section may be extended by a legislative authority for up to an additional ten years if the dwelling is a structure of historical or architectural significance, is a certified historic structure that has been subject to federal tax treatment under 26 U.S.C. 47 and 170(h), and units within the structure have been leased to individual tenants for five consecutive years; (2) Except as provided in division (F) of this section, for construction of every dwelling, and commercial or industrial structure located within the same community reinvestment area, a period to be determined by the legislative authority adopting the resolution, but not exceeding one of the following: (a) Thirty years, if the commercial or industrial structure is situated on the site of a megaproject and is owned or occupied by a megaproject operator as defined in division (A)(12) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code, or is not situated on the site of a megaproject but is owned or occupied by a megaproject supplier that meets the requirements described in division (A)(13)(b) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code; (b) Fifteen years, for any other dwelling or commercial or industrial structure. (E) Any person, board, or officer authorized by section 5715.19 of the Revised Code to file complaints with the county board of revision may file a complaint with the housing officer challenging the continued exemption of any property granted an exemption under this section. A complaint against exemption shall be filed prior to the thirty-first day of December of the tax year for which taxation of the property is requested. The housing officer shall determine whether the property continues to meet the requirements for exemption and shall certify the housing officer's findings to the complainant. If the housing officer determines that the property does not meet the requirements for exemption, the housing officer shall notify the county auditor, who shall correct the tax list and duplicate accordingly. (F) The owner of a dwelling constructed in a community reinvestment area may file an application for an exemption after the year the construction first became subject to taxation. The application shall be processed in accordance with the procedures prescribed under this section and shall be granted if the construction that is the subject of the application otherwise meets the requirements for an exemption under this section. If approved, the exemption sought in the application first applies in the year the application is filed. An exemption approved pursuant to this division continues only for those years remaining in the period described in division (D)(2) of this section. No exemption may be claimed for any year in that period that precedes the year in which the application is filed. (G) For agreements entered into under section 3735.671 of the Revised Code on or after the effective date of this amendment or, in the case of a structure or remodeling that is to be used for residential purposes, for an exemption approved by a housing officer under this section on or after the effective date of this amendment, the structure or remodeling shall not be exempt from any of the following: (1) A tax levied by a joint fire district, fire and ambulance district, joint ambulance district, or joint emergency medical services district; (2) A tax levied by a township under section 505.39 or division (I), (U), or (JJ) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code; (3) A tax levied by a township fire district. Divisions (G)(2) and (3) of this section do not apply if the board of trustees of the township that levies the tax is the same board that adopted the resolution under section 3735.66 of the Revised Code pursuant to which the exemption is authorized. Sec. 5709.40. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Blighted area" and "impacted city" have the same meanings as in section 1728.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Business day" means a day of the week excluding Saturday, Sunday, and a legal holiday as defined under section 1.14 of the Revised Code. (3) "Housing renovation" means a project carried out for residential purposes. (4) "Improvement" means the increase in the assessed value of any real property that would first appear on the tax list and duplicate of real and public utility property after the effective date of an ordinance adopted under this section were it not for the exemption granted by that ordinance. (5) "Incentive district" means an area not more than three hundred acres in size enclosed by a continuous boundary in which a project is being, or will be, undertaken and having one or more of the following distress characteristics: (a) At least fifty-one per cent of the residents of the district have incomes of less than eighty per cent of the median income of residents of the political subdivision in which the district is located, as determined in the same manner specified under section 119(b) of the "Housing and Community Development Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 633, 42 U.S.C. 5318, as amended; (b) The average rate of unemployment in the district during the most recent twelve-month period for which data are available is equal to at least one hundred fifty per cent of the average rate of unemployment for this state for the same period. (c) At least twenty per cent of the people residing in the district live at or below the poverty level as defined in the federal Housing and Community Development Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. 5301, as amended, and regulations adopted pursuant to that act. (d) The district is a blighted area. (e) The district is in a situational distress area as designated by the director of development under division (F) of section 122.23 of the Revised Code. (f) As certified by the engineer for the political subdivision, the public infrastructure serving the district is inadequate to meet the development needs of the district as evidenced by a written economic development plan or urban renewal plan for the district that has been adopted by the legislative authority of the subdivision. (g) The district is comprised entirely of unimproved land that is located in a distressed area as defined in section 122.23 of the Revised Code. (6) "Overlay" means an area of not more than three hundred acres that is a square, or that is a rectangle having two longer sides that are not more than twice the length of the two shorter sides, that the legislative authority of a municipal corporation delineates on a map of a proposed incentive district. (7) "Project" means development activities undertaken on one or more parcels, including, but not limited to, construction, expansion, and alteration of buildings or structures, demolition, remediation, and site development, and any building or structure that results from those activities. (8) "Public infrastructure improvement" includes, but is not limited to, public roads and highways; water and sewer lines; the continued maintenance of those public roads and highways and water and sewer lines; environmental remediation; land acquisition, including acquisition in aid of industry, commerce, distribution, or research; demolition, including demolition on private property when determined to be necessary for economic development purposes; stormwater and flood remediation projects, including such projects on private property when determined to be necessary for public health, safety, and welfare; the provision of gas, electric, and communications service facilities, including the provision of gas or electric service facilities owned by nongovernmental entities when such improvements are determined to be necessary for economic development purposes; the enhancement of public waterways through improvements that allow for greater public access; and off-street parking facilities, including those in which all or a portion of the parking spaces are reserved for specific uses when determined to be necessary for economic development purposes. (9) "Nonperforming parcel" means a parcel to which all of the following apply: (a) The parcel is exempted from taxation under division (B) of this section or has been included in a district created under division (C) of this section. (b) The parcel's owner is required to make payments in lieu of taxes in accordance with section 5709.42 of the Revised Code. (c) No such payments have been remitted to the county treasurer since the inception of the exemption or district. (10) "Qualifying fire or emergency medical services tax" means any of the following: (a) A tax levied by a joint fire district, township fire district, fire and ambulance district, joint ambulance district, or joint emergency medical services district. (b) A tax levied by a township under section 505.39 or division (I), (U), or (JJ) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code. (B) The legislative authority of a municipal corporation, by ordinance, may declare improvements to certain parcels of real property located in the municipal corporation to be a public purpose. Improvements with respect to a parcel that is used or to be used for residential purposes may be declared a public purpose under this division only if the parcel is located in a blighted area of an impacted city. For this purpose, "parcel that is used or to be used for residential purposes" means a parcel that, as improved, is used or to be used for purposes that would cause the tax commissioner to classify the parcel as residential property in accordance with rules adopted by the commissioner under section 5713.041 of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided under division (D) of this section or section 5709.51 or 5709.511 of the Revised Code, not more than seventy-five per cent of an improvement thus declared to be a public purpose may be exempted from real property taxation for a period of not more than ten years. The ordinance shall specify the percentage of the improvement to be exempted from taxation and the life of the exemption. An ordinance adopted or amended under this division shall designate the specific public infrastructure improvements made, to be made, or in the process of being made by the municipal corporation that directly benefit, or that once made will directly benefit, the parcels for which improvements are declared to be a public purpose. The service payments provided for in section 5709.42 of the Revised Code shall be used to finance the public infrastructure improvements designated in the ordinance, for the purpose described in division (D)(1) of this section or as provided in section 5709.43 of the Revised Code. Improvements exempted from taxation under division (B) of this section shall not be exempted from a qualifying fire or emergency medical services tax. (C)(1) The legislative authority of a municipal corporation may adopt an ordinance creating an incentive district and declaring improvements to parcels within the district to be a public purpose and, except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, exempt from taxation as provided in this section, but no legislative authority of a municipal corporation that has a population that exceeds twenty-five thousand, as shown by the most recent federal decennial census, shall adopt an ordinance that creates an incentive district if the sum of the taxable value of real property in the proposed district for the preceding tax year and the taxable value of all real property in the municipal corporation that would have been taxable in the preceding year were it not for the fact that the property was in an existing incentive district and therefore exempt from taxation exceeds twenty-five per cent of the taxable value of real property in the municipal corporation for the preceding tax year. The ordinance shall delineate the boundary of the proposed district and specifically identify each parcel within the district. A proposed district may not include any parcel, other than a nonperforming parcel, that is or has been exempted from taxation under division (B) of this section or that is or has been within another district created under this division. On and after the effective date of the district, a nonperforming parcel within the district is no longer exempted from taxation under division (B) of this section or included within an incentive district under any previous ordinance, and the parcel's owner is no longer required to make payments in lieu of taxes under such a previous ordinance in accordance with section 5709.42 of the Revised Code. Any exemption application filed with the tax commissioner under section 5715.27 of the Revised Code under the second ordinance shall identify the nonperforming parcels included in the second district, the original ordinance under which the nonperforming parcels were originally exempted, and the value history of each nonperforming parcel since the enactment of the original ordinance. An ordinance may create more than one such district, and more than one ordinance may be adopted under division (C)(1) of this section. (2)(a) Not later than thirty days prior to adopting an ordinance under division (C)(1) of this section, if the municipal corporation intends to apply for exemptions from taxation under section 5709.911 of the Revised Code on behalf of owners of real property located within the proposed incentive district, the legislative authority of the municipal corporation shall conduct a public hearing on the proposed ordinance. Not later than thirty days prior to the public hearing, the legislative authority shall give notice of the public hearing and the proposed ordinance by first class mail to every real property owner whose property is located within the boundaries of the proposed incentive district that is the subject of the proposed ordinance. The notice shall include a map of the proposed incentive district on which the legislative authority of the municipal corporation shall have delineated an overlay. The notice shall inform the property owner of the owner's right to exclude the owner's property from the incentive district if the owner's entire parcel of property will not be located within the overlay, by submitting a written response in accordance with division (C)(2)(b) of this section. The notice also shall include information detailing the required contents of the response, the address to which the response may be mailed, and the deadline for submitting the response. (b) Any owner of real property located within the boundaries of an incentive district proposed under division (C)(1) of this section whose entire parcel of property is not located within the overlay may exclude the property from the proposed incentive district by submitting a written response to the legislative authority of the municipal corporation not later than forty-five days after the postmark date on the notice required under division (C)(2)(a) of this section. The response shall be sent by first class mail or delivered in person at a public hearing held by the legislative authority under division (C)(2)(a) of this section. The response shall conform to any content requirements that may be established by the municipal corporation and included in the notice provided under division (C)(2)(a) of this section. In the response, property owners may identify a parcel by street address, by the manner in which it is identified in the ordinance, or by other means allowing the identity of the parcel to be ascertained. (c) Before adopting an ordinance under division (C)(1) of this section, the legislative authority of a municipal corporation shall amend the ordinance to exclude any parcel located wholly or partly outside the overlay for which a written response has been submitted under division (C)(2)(b) of this section. A municipal corporation shall not apply for exemptions from taxation under section 5709.911 of the Revised Code for any such parcel, and service payments may not be required from the owner of the parcel. Improvements to a parcel excluded from an incentive district under this division may be exempted from taxation under division (B) of this section pursuant to an ordinance adopted under that division or under any other section of the Revised Code under which the parcel qualifies. (3)(a) An ordinance adopted under division (C)(1) of this section shall specify the life of the incentive district and the percentage of the improvements to be exempted, shall designate the public infrastructure improvements made, to be made, or in the process of being made, that benefit or serve, or, once made, will benefit or serve parcels in the district. The ordinance also shall identify one or more specific projects being, or to be, undertaken in the district that place additional demand on the public infrastructure improvements designated in the ordinance. The project identified may, but need not be, the project under division (C)(3)(b) of this section that places real property in use for commercial or industrial purposes. Except as otherwise permitted under that division, the service payments provided for in section 5709.42 of the Revised Code shall be used to finance the designated public infrastructure improvements, for the purpose described in division (D)(1), (E), or (F) of this section, or as provided in section 5709.43 of the Revised Code. An ordinance adopted under division (C)(1) of this section on or after March 30, 2006, shall not designate police or fire equipment as public infrastructure improvements, and no service payment provided for in section 5709.42 of the Revised Code and received by the municipal corporation under the ordinance shall be used for police or fire equipment. (b) An ordinance adopted under division (C)(1) of this section may authorize the use of service payments provided for in section 5709.42 of the Revised Code for the purpose of housing renovations within the incentive district, provided that the ordinance also designates public infrastructure improvements that benefit or serve the district, and that a project within the district places real property in use for commercial or industrial purposes. Service payments may be used to finance or support loans, deferred loans, and grants to persons for the purpose of housing renovations within the district. The ordinance shall designate the parcels within the district that are eligible for housing renovation. The ordinance shall state separately the amounts or the percentages of the expected aggregate service payments that are designated for each public infrastructure improvement and for the general purpose of housing renovations. (4) Except with the approval of the board of education of each city, local, or exempted village school district within the territory of which the incentive district is or will be located, and subject to division (E) of this section, the life of an incentive district shall not exceed ten years, and the percentage of improvements to be exempted shall not exceed seventy-five per cent. With approval of the board of education, the life of a district may be not more than thirty years, and the percentage of improvements to be exempted may be not more than one hundred per cent. The approval of a board of education shall be obtained in the manner provided in division (D) of this section. (D)(1) If the ordinance declaring improvements to a parcel to be a public purpose or creating an incentive district specifies that payments in lieu of taxes provided for in section 5709.42 of the Revised Code shall be paid to the city, local, or exempted village, and joint vocational school district in which the parcel or incentive district is located in the amount of the taxes that would have been payable to the school district if the improvements had not been exempted from taxation, the percentage of the improvement that may be exempted from taxation may exceed seventy-five per cent, and the exemption may be granted for up to thirty years, without the approval of the board of education as otherwise required under division (D)(2) of this section. (2) Improvements with respect to a parcel may be exempted from taxation under division (B) of this section, and improvements to parcels within an incentive district may be exempted from taxation under division (C) of this section, for up to ten years or, with the approval under this paragraph of the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district within which the parcel or district is located, for up to thirty years. The percentage of the improvement exempted from taxation may, with such approval, exceed seventy-five per cent, but shall not exceed one hundred per cent. Not later than forty-five business days prior to adopting an ordinance under this section declaring improvements to be a public purpose that is subject to approval by a board of education under this division, the legislative authority shall deliver to the board of education a notice stating its intent to adopt an ordinance making that declaration. The notice regarding improvements with respect to a parcel under division (B) of this section shall identify the parcels for which improvements are to be exempted from taxation, provide an estimate of the true value in money of the improvements, specify the period for which the improvements would be exempted from taxation and the percentage of the improvement that would be exempted, and indicate the date on which the legislative authority intends to adopt the ordinance. The notice regarding improvements to parcels within an incentive district under division (C) of this section shall delineate the boundaries of the district, specifically identify each parcel within the district, identify each anticipated improvement in the district, provide an estimate of the true value in money of each such improvement, specify the life of the district and the percentage of improvements that would be exempted, and indicate the date on which the legislative authority intends to adopt the ordinance. The board of education, by resolution adopted by a majority of the board, may approve the exemption for the period or for the exemption percentage specified in the notice; may disapprove the exemption for the number of years in excess of ten, may disapprove the exemption for the percentage of the improvement to be exempted in excess of seventy-five per cent, or both; or may approve the exemption on the condition that the legislative authority and the board negotiate an agreement providing for compensation to the school district equal in value to a percentage of the amount of taxes exempted in the eleventh and subsequent years of the exemption period or, in the case of exemption percentages in excess of seventy-five per cent, compensation equal in value to a percentage of the taxes that would be payable on the portion of the improvement in excess of seventy-five per cent were that portion to be subject to taxation, or other mutually agreeable compensation. If an agreement is negotiated between the legislative authority and the board to compensate the school district for all or part of the taxes exempted, including agreements for payments in lieu of taxes under section 5709.42 of the Revised Code, the legislative authority shall compensate the joint vocational school district within which the parcel or district is located at the same rate and under the same terms received by the city, local, or exempted village school district. (3) The board of education shall certify its resolution to the legislative authority not later than fourteen days prior to the date the legislative authority intends to adopt the ordinance as indicated in the notice. If the board of education and the legislative authority negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement, the ordinance may declare the improvements a public purpose for the number of years specified in the ordinance or, in the case of exemption percentages in excess of seventy-five per cent, for the exemption percentage specified in the ordinance. In either case, if the board and the legislative authority fail to negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement, the ordinance may declare the improvements a public purpose for not more than ten years, and shall not exempt more than seventy-five per cent of the improvements from taxation. If the board fails to certify a resolution to the legislative authority within the time prescribed by this division, the legislative authority thereupon may adopt the ordinance and may declare the improvements a public purpose for up to thirty years, or, in the case of exemption percentages proposed in excess of seventy-five per cent, for the exemption percentage specified in the ordinance. The legislative authority may adopt the ordinance at any time after the board of education certifies its resolution approving the exemption to the legislative authority, or, if the board approves the exemption on the condition that a mutually acceptable compensation agreement be negotiated, at any time after the compensation agreement is agreed to by the board and the legislative authority. (4) If a board of education has adopted a resolution waiving its right to approve exemptions from taxation under this section and the resolution remains in effect, approval of exemptions by the board is not required under division (D) of this section. If a board of education has adopted a resolution allowing a legislative authority to deliver the notice required under division (D) of this section fewer than forty-five business days prior to the legislative authority's adoption of the ordinance, the legislative authority shall deliver the notice to the board not later than the number of days prior to such adoption as prescribed by the board in its resolution. If a board of education adopts a resolution waiving its right to approve agreements or shortening the notification period, the board shall certify a copy of the resolution to the legislative authority. If the board of education rescinds such a resolution, it shall certify notice of the rescission to the legislative authority. (5) If the legislative authority is not required by division (D) of this section to notify the board of education of the legislative authority's intent to declare improvements to be a public purpose, the legislative authority shall comply with the notice requirements imposed under section 5709.83 of the Revised Code, unless the board has adopted a resolution under that section waiving its right to receive such a notice. (6) Nothing in division (D) of this section prohibits the legislative authority of a municipal corporation from amending the ordinance or resolution under section 5709.51 or 5709.511 of the Revised Code to extend the term of the exemption. (E)(1) If a proposed ordinance under division (C)(1) of this section exempts improvements with respect to a parcel within an incentive district for more than ten years, or the percentage of the improvement exempted from taxation exceeds seventy-five per cent, not later than forty-five business days prior to adopting the ordinance the legislative authority of the municipal corporation shall deliver to the board of county commissioners of the county within which the incentive district will be located a notice that states its intent to adopt an ordinance creating an incentive district. The notice shall include a copy of the proposed ordinance, identify the parcels for which improvements are to be exempted from taxation, provide an estimate of the true value in money of the improvements, specify the period of time for which the improvements would be exempted from taxation, specify the percentage of the improvements that would be exempted from taxation, and indicate the date on which the legislative authority intends to adopt the ordinance. (2) The board of county commissioners, by resolution adopted by a majority of the board, may object to the exemption for the number of years in excess of ten, may object to the exemption for the percentage of the improvement to be exempted in excess of seventy-five per cent, or both. If the board of county commissioners objects, the board may negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement with the legislative authority. In no case shall the compensation provided to the board exceed the property taxes forgone due to the exemption. If the board of county commissioners objects, and the board and legislative authority fail to negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement, the ordinance adopted under division (C)(1) of this section shall provide to the board compensation in the eleventh and subsequent years of the exemption period equal in value to not more than fifty per cent of the taxes that would be payable to the county or, if the board's objection includes an objection to an exemption percentage in excess of seventy-five per cent, compensation equal in value to not more than fifty per cent of the taxes that would be payable to the county, on the portion of the improvement in excess of seventy-five per cent, were that portion to be subject to taxation. The board of county commissioners shall certify its resolution to the legislative authority not later than thirty days after receipt of the notice. (3) If the board of county commissioners does not object or fails to certify its resolution objecting to an exemption within thirty days after receipt of the notice, the legislative authority may adopt the ordinance, and no compensation shall be provided to the board of county commissioners. If the board timely certifies its resolution objecting to the ordinance, the legislative authority may adopt the ordinance at any time after a mutually acceptable compensation agreement is agreed to by the board and the legislative authority, or, if no compensation agreement is negotiated, at any time after the legislative authority agrees in the proposed ordinance to provide compensation to the board of fifty per cent of the taxes that would be payable to the county in the eleventh and subsequent years of the exemption period or on the portion of the improvement in excess of seventy-five per cent, were that portion to be subject to taxation. (F) Service payments in lieu of taxes that are attributable to any amount by which the effective tax rate of either a renewal levy with an increase or a replacement levy exceeds the effective tax rate of the levy renewed or replaced, or that are attributable to an additional levy, for a levy authorized by the voters for any of the following purposes on or after January 1, 2006, and which are provided pursuant to an ordinance creating an incentive district under division (C)(1) of this section that is adopted on or after January 1, 2006, or a later date as specified in this division, shall be distributed to the appropriate taxing authority as required under division (C) of section 5709.42 of the Revised Code in an amount equal to the amount of taxes from that additional levy or from the increase in the effective tax rate of such renewal or replacement levy that would have been payable to that taxing authority from the following levies were it not for the exemption authorized under division (C) of this section: (1) A tax levied under division (L) of section 5705.19 or section 5705.191 or 5705.222 of the Revised Code for community developmental disabilities programs and services pursuant to Chapter 5126. of the Revised Code; (2) A tax levied under division (Y) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code for providing or maintaining senior citizens services or facilities; (3) A tax levied under section 5705.22 of the Revised Code for county hospitals; (4) A tax levied by a joint-county district or by a county under section 5705.19, 5705.191, or 5705.221 of the Revised Code for alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or facilities; (5) A tax levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code for library purposes; (6) A tax levied under section 5705.24 of the Revised Code for the support of children services and the placement and care of children; (7) A tax levied under division (Z) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code for the provision and maintenance of zoological park services and facilities under section 307.76 of the Revised Code; (8) A tax levied under section 511.27 or division (H) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code for the support of township park districts; (9) A tax levied under division (A), (F), or (H) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code for parks and recreational purposes of a joint recreation district organized pursuant to division (B) of section 755.14 of the Revised Code; (10) A tax levied under section 1545.20 or 1545.21 of the Revised Code for park district purposes; (11) A tax levied under section 5705.191 of the Revised Code for the purpose of making appropriations for public assistance; human or social services; public relief; public welfare; public health and hospitalization; and support of general hospitals; (12) A tax levied under section 3709.29 of the Revised Code for a general health district program. (13) A tax levied by a township under section 505.39, division (I) of section 5705.19, or division (JJ) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code to the extent the proceeds are used for the purposes described in division (I) of that section, for the purpose of funding qualifying fire, emergency medical, and ambulance services as described in that section and those divisions. Division (F)(13) of this section applies only if the township levying the tax provides fire, emergency medical, or ambulance services in the incentive district, and only to incentive districts created by an ordinance adopted on or after the effective date of the amendment of this section by H.B. 69 of the 132nd general assembly, March 23, 2018 or emergency medical services tax. The board of township trustees may, by resolution, waive the application of this division or negotiate with the municipal corporation that created the district for a lesser amount of payments in lieu of taxes. (G) An exemption from taxation granted under this section commences with the tax year specified in the ordinance so long as the year specified in the ordinance commences after the effective date of the ordinance. If the ordinance specifies a year commencing before the effective date of the resolution or specifies no year whatsoever, the exemption commences with the tax year in which an exempted improvement first appears on the tax list and duplicate of real and public utility property and that commences after the effective date of the ordinance. In lieu of stating a specific year, the ordinance may provide that the exemption commences in the tax year in which the value of an improvement exceeds a specified amount or in which the construction of one or more improvements is completed, provided that such tax year commences after the effective date of the ordinance. With respect to the exemption of improvements to parcels under division (B) of this section, the ordinance may allow for the exemption to commence in different tax years on a parcel-by-parcel basis, with a separate exemption term specified for each parcel. Except as otherwise provided in this division or section 5709.51 or 5709.511 of the Revised Code, the exemption ends on the date specified in the ordinance as the date the improvement ceases to be a public purpose or the incentive district expires, or ends on the date on which the public infrastructure improvements and housing renovations are paid in full from the municipal public improvement tax increment equivalent fund established under division (A) of section 5709.43 of the Revised Code, whichever occurs first. The exemption of an improvement with respect to a parcel or within an incentive district may end on a later date, as specified in the ordinance, if the legislative authority and the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district within which the parcel or district is located have entered into a compensation agreement under section 5709.82 of the Revised Code with respect to the improvement, and the board of education has approved the term of the exemption under division (D)(2) of this section, but in no case shall the improvement be exempted from taxation for more than thirty years. Exemptions shall be claimed and allowed in the same manner as in the case of other real property exemptions. If an exemption status changes during a year, the procedure for the apportionment of the taxes for that year is the same as in the case of other changes in tax exemption status during the year. (H) Additional municipal financing of public infrastructure improvements and housing renovations may be provided by any methods that the municipal corporation may otherwise use for financing such improvements or renovations. If the municipal corporation issues bonds or notes to finance the public infrastructure improvements and housing renovations and pledges money from the municipal public improvement tax increment equivalent fund to pay the interest on and principal of the bonds or notes, the bonds or notes are not subject to Chapter 133. of the Revised Code. (I) The municipal corporation, not later than fifteen days after the adoption of an ordinance under this section, shall submit to the director of development a copy of the ordinance. On or before the thirty-first day of March of each year, the municipal corporation shall submit a status report to the director. The report shall indicate, in the manner prescribed by the director, the progress of the project during each year that an exemption remains in effect, including a summary of the receipts from service payments in lieu of taxes; expenditures of money from the funds created under section 5709.43 of the Revised Code; a description of the public infrastructure improvements and housing renovations financed with such expenditures; and a quantitative summary of changes in employment and private investment resulting from each project. (J) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a legislative authority from declaring to be a public purpose improvements with respect to more than one parcel. (K) If a parcel is located in a new community district in which the new community authority imposes a community development charge on the basis of rentals received from leases of real property as described in division (L)(2) of section 349.01 of the Revised Code, the parcel may not be exempted from taxation under this section. (L)(1) Notwithstanding the limitations on the life of an incentive district and the number of years that improvements to a parcel or parcels within an incentive district may be exempted from taxation prescribed by divisions (C) and (D) of this section, the legislative authority of a municipal corporation may amend an ordinance originally adopted under division (C) of this section before January 1, 2006, to extend the life of an incentive district created by that ordinance. The extension shall be for a period not to exceed fifteen years and shall not increase the percentage of the value of improvements exempted from taxation. (2) Before adopting an amendment authorized by division (L)(1) of this section, the legislative authority of the municipal corporation shall provide notice of the amendment to each board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district in which the incentive district is located, in the same manner as provided under division (D) of this section, and shall obtain the approval of each such board in the manner required under that division, except both of the following apply: (a) The board of education may approve the exemption on the condition that the legislative authority and the board negotiate an agreement providing for mutually agreeable compensation to the school district. (b) If the board of education fails to certify a resolution approving the amendment to the legislative authority within the time prescribed by division (D) of this section, the legislative authority shall not adopt the amendment authorized under division (L) of this section. (3) No approval otherwise required by division (L)(2) of this section shall be required from a board of education if either of the following apply: (a) The amendment provides for compensation to the city, local, or exempted village school district in which the incentive district is located equal in value to the amount of taxes that would be payable to the school district if the improvements exempted from taxation had not been exempted for the additional period. (b) The board of education has adopted a resolution waiving its right to approve exemptions from taxation pursuant to division (D)(4) of this section. If the board has adopted such a resolution, the municipal corporation shall comply with the notice requirements imposed by section 5709.83 of the Revised Code before taking formal action to adopt an amendment authorized under division (L)(1) of this section unless the board has adopted a resolution under that section waiving its right to receive that notice. (4) Not later than fourteen days before adopting an amendment authorized by division (L)(1) of this section, the legislative authority of the municipal corporation shall deliver a notice identical to a notice required under section 5709.83 of the Revised Code to the board of county commissioners of each county in which the incentive district is located. Sec. 5709.41. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Business day" means a day of the week excluding Saturday, Sunday, and a legal holiday as defined under section 1.14 of the Revised Code. (2) "Improvement" means the increase in assessed value of any parcel of property subsequent to the acquisition of the parcel by a municipal corporation engaged in urban redevelopment or by a township engaged in redevelopment. (B) The legislative authority of a municipal corporation or township, by ordinance or resolution, may declare to be a public purpose any improvement to a parcel of real property if both of the following apply: (1) The municipal corporation or township held fee title to the parcel prior to the adoption of the ordinance or resolution; (2) The parcel is leased, or the fee of the parcel is conveyed, to any person either before or after adoption of the ordinance or resolution. Improvements used or to be used for residential purposes may be declared a public purpose under this section only if the parcel is located in a blighted area of an impacted city, in the case of a municipal corporation, or in a blighted area, in the case of a township, as those terms are defined in section 1728.01 of the Revised Code. For this purpose, "parcel that is used or to be used for residential purposes" means a parcel that, as improved, is used or to be used for purposes that would cause the tax commissioner to classify the parcel as residential property in accordance with rules adopted by the commissioner under section 5713.041 of the Revised Code. Improvements exempted from taxation under this section shall not be exempted from a qualifying fire or emergency medical services tax, as defined in section 5709.40 of the Revised Code. (C) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, not more than seventy-five per cent of an improvement thus declared to be a public purpose may be exempted from real property taxation. The ordinance or resolution shall specify the percentage of the improvement to be exempted from taxation. If a parcel is located in a new community district in which the new community authority imposes a community development charge on the basis of rentals received from leases of real property as described in division (L)(2) of section 349.01 of the Revised Code, the parcel may not be exempted from taxation under this section. (1) If the ordinance or resolution declaring improvements to a parcel to be a public purpose specifies that payments in lieu of taxes provided for in section 5709.42 or 5709.74 of the Revised Code shall be paid to the city, local, or exempted village school district in which the parcel is located in the amount of the taxes that would have been payable to the school district if the improvements had not been exempted from taxation, the percentage of the improvement that may be exempted from taxation may exceed seventy-five per cent, and the exemption may be granted for up to thirty years, without the approval of the board of education as otherwise required under division (C)(2) of this section. (2) Improvements may be exempted from taxation for up to ten years or, with the approval of the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district within the territory of which the improvements are or will be located, for up to thirty years. The percentage of the improvement exempted from taxation may, with such approval, exceed seventy-five per cent, but shall not exceed one hundred per cent. Not later than forty-five business days prior to adopting an ordinance or resolution under this section, the legislative authority shall deliver to the board of education a notice stating its intent to declare improvements to be a public purpose under this section. The notice shall describe the parcel and the improvements, provide an estimate of the true value in money of the improvements, specify the period for which the improvements would be exempted from taxation and the percentage of the improvements that would be exempted, and indicate the date on which the legislative authority intends to adopt the ordinance or resolution. The board of education, by resolution adopted by a majority of the board, may approve the exemption for the period or for the exemption percentage specified in the notice, may disapprove the exemption for the number of years in excess of ten, may disapprove the exemption for the percentage of the improvements to be exempted in excess of seventy-five per cent, or both, or may approve the exemption on the condition that the legislative authority and the board negotiate an agreement providing for compensation to the school district equal in value to a percentage of the amount of taxes exempted in the eleventh and subsequent years of the exemption period, or, in the case of exemption percentages in excess of seventy-five per cent, compensation equal in value to a percentage of the taxes that would be payable on the portion of the improvement in excess of seventy-five per cent were that portion to be subject to taxation. The board of education shall certify its resolution to the legislative authority not later than fourteen days prior to the date the legislative authority intends to adopt the ordinance or resolution as indicated in the notice. If the board of education approves the exemption on the condition that a compensation agreement be negotiated, the board in its resolution shall propose a compensation percentage. If the board of education and the legislative authority negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement, the ordinance or resolution may declare the improvements a public purpose for the number of years specified in the ordinance or resolution or, in the case of exemption percentages in excess of seventy-five per cent, for the exemption percentage specified in the ordinance or resolution. In either case, if the board and the legislative authority fail to negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement, the ordinance or resolution may declare the improvements a public purpose for not more than ten years, but shall not exempt more than seventy-five per cent of the improvements from taxation. If the board fails to certify a resolution to the legislative authority within the time prescribed by this division, the legislative authority thereupon may adopt the ordinance or resolution and may declare the improvements a public purpose for up to thirty years. The legislative authority may adopt the ordinance or resolution at any time after the board of education certifies its resolution approving the exemption to the legislative authority, or, if the board approves the exemption on the condition that a mutually acceptable compensation agreement be negotiated, at any time after the compensation agreement is agreed to by the board and the legislative authority. If a mutually acceptable compensation agreement is negotiated between the legislative authority and the board, including agreements for payments in lieu of taxes under section 5709.42 or 5709.74 of the Revised Code, the legislative authority shall compensate the joint vocational school district within the territory of which the improvements are or will be located at the same rate and under the same terms received by the city, local, or exempted village school district. (3) If a board of education has adopted a resolution waiving its right to approve exemptions from taxation and the resolution remains in effect, approval of exemptions by the board is not required under this division. If a board of education has adopted a resolution allowing a legislative authority to deliver the notice required under this division fewer than forty-five business days prior to the legislative authority's adoption of the ordinance or resolution, the legislative authority shall deliver the notice to the board not later than the number of days prior to such adoption as prescribed by the board in its resolution. If a board of education adopts a resolution waiving its right to approve exemptions or shortening the notification period, the board shall certify a copy of the resolution to the legislative authority. If the board of education rescinds such a resolution, it shall certify notice of the rescission to the legislative authority. (4) If the legislative authority is not required by division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section to notify the board of education of the legislative authority's intent to declare improvements to be a public purpose, the legislative authority shall comply with the notice requirements imposed under section 5709.83 of the Revised Code, unless the board has adopted a resolution under that section waiving its right to receive such a notice. (5) Nothing in division (C) of this section prohibits the legislative authority of a municipal corporation or township from amending the ordinance or resolution under section 5709.51 or 5709.511 of the Revised Code to extend the term of the exemption. (D) An exemption granted under this section commences with the tax year specified in the ordinance or resolution so long as the year specified in the ordinance or resolution commences after the effective date of the ordinance or resolution. If the ordinance or resolution specifies a year commencing before the effective date of the ordinance or resolution or specifies no year, the exemption commences with the tax year in which an exempted improvement first appears on the tax list and that commences after the effective date of the ordinance or resolution. In lieu of stating a specific year, the ordinance or resolution may provide that the exemption commences in the tax year in which the value of an improvement exceeds a specified amount or in which the construction of one or more improvements is completed, provided that such tax year commences after the effective date of the ordinance or resolution. In lieu of stating a specific year, the ordinance or resolution may allow for the exemption to commence in different tax years on a parcel-by-parcel basis, with a separate exemption term specified for each parcel. The exemption ends on the date specified in the ordinance or resolution as the date the improvement ceases to be a public purpose. The exemption shall be claimed and allowed in the same or a similar manner as in the case of other real property exemptions. If an exemption status changes during a tax year, the procedure for the apportionment of the taxes for that year is the same as in the case of other changes in tax exemption status during the year. (E) A municipal corporation or township, not later than fifteen days after the adoption of an ordinance or resolution granting a tax exemption under this section, shall submit to the director of development a copy of the ordinance or resolution. On or before the thirty-first day of March each year, the municipal corporation or township shall submit a status report to the director of development outlining the progress of the project during each year that the exemption remains in effect. Sec. 5709.73. (A) As used in this section and section 5709.74 of the Revised Code: (1) "Business day" means a day of the week excluding Saturday, Sunday, and a legal holiday as defined in section 1.14 of the Revised Code. (2) "Further improvements" or "improvements" means the increase in the assessed value of real property that would first appear on the tax list and duplicate of real and public utility property after the effective date of a resolution adopted under this section were it not for the exemption granted by that resolution. For purposes of division (B) of this section, "improvements" do not include any property used or to be used for residential purposes. For this purpose, "property that is used or to be used for residential purposes" means property that, as improved, is used or to be used for purposes that would cause the tax commissioner to classify the property as residential property in accordance with rules adopted by the commissioner under section 5713.041 of the Revised Code. (3) "Housing renovation" means a project carried out for residential purposes. (4) "Incentive district" has the same meaning as in section 5709.40 of the Revised Code, except that a blighted area is in the unincorporated area of a township. (5) "Overlay" has the same meaning as in section 5709.40 of the Revised Code, except that the overlay is delineated by the board of township trustees. (6) "Project" and "Project," "public infrastructure improvement," and "qualifying fire or emergency medical services tax" have the same meanings as in section 5709.40 of the Revised Code. (7) "Urban township" has the same meaning as in section 504.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Nonperforming parcel" means a parcel to which all of the following apply: (a) The parcel is exempted from taxation under division (B) of this section or has been included in a district created under division (C) of this section. (b) The parcel's owner is required to make payments in lieu of taxes in accordance with section 5709.74 of the Revised Code. (c) No such payments have been remitted to the county treasurer since the inception of the exemption or district. (B) A board of township trustees may adopt a resolution that declares to be a public purpose any public infrastructure improvements made that are necessary for the development of certain parcels of land located in the unincorporated area of the township. Except for a resolution adopted by the board of an urban township, the resolution shall be adopted by a unanimous vote of the board. Except as otherwise provided under division (D) of this section or section 5709.51 or 5709.511 of the Revised Code, the resolution may exempt from real property taxation not more than seventy-five per cent of further improvements to a parcel of land that directly benefits from the public infrastructure improvements, for a period of not more than ten years. The resolution shall specify the percentage of the further improvements to be exempted and the life of the exemption. Improvements exempted from taxation under this section shall not be exempted from a qualifying fire or emergency medical services tax. (C)(1) A board of township trustees may adopt a resolution creating an incentive district and declaring improvements to parcels within the district to be a public purpose and, except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, exempt from taxation as provided in this section. Except for a resolution adopted by the board of an urban township, the resolution shall be adopted by a unanimous vote of the board. A board of township trustees of a township that has a population that exceeds twenty-five thousand, as shown by the most recent federal decennial census, may not adopt a resolution that creates an incentive district if the sum of the taxable value of real property in the proposed district for the preceding tax year and the taxable value of all real property in the township that would have been taxable in the preceding year were it not for the fact that the property was in an existing incentive district and therefore exempt from taxation exceeds twenty-five per cent of the taxable value of real property in the township for the preceding tax year. The district shall be located within the unincorporated area of the township and shall not include any territory that is included within a district created under division (B) of section 5709.78 of the Revised Code. The resolution shall delineate the boundary of the proposed district and specifically identify each parcel within the district. A proposed district may not include any parcel, other than a nonperforming parcel, that is or has been exempted from taxation under division (B) of this section or that is or has been within another district created under this division. On and after the effective date of the district, a nonperforming parcel within the district is no longer exempted from taxation under division (B) of this section or included within an incentive district under any previous resolution, and the parcel's owner is no longer required to make payments in lieu of taxes under such a previous resolution in accordance with section 5709.74 of the Revised Code. Any exemption application filed with the tax commissioner under section 5715.27 of the Revised Code under the second resolution shall identify the nonperforming parcels included in the second district, the original resolution under which the nonperforming parcels were originally exempted, and the value history of each nonperforming parcel since the enactment of the original resolution. A resolution may create more than one such district, and more than one resolution may be adopted under division (C)(1) of this section. (2)(a) Not later than thirty days prior to adopting a resolution under division (C)(1) of this section, if the township intends to apply for exemptions from taxation under section 5709.911 of the Revised Code on behalf of owners of real property located within the proposed incentive district, the board shall conduct a public hearing on the proposed resolution. Not later than thirty days prior to the public hearing, the board shall give notice of the public hearing and the proposed resolution by first class mail to every real property owner whose property is located within the boundaries of the proposed incentive district that is the subject of the proposed resolution. The notice shall include a map of the proposed incentive district on which the board of township trustees shall have delineated an overlay. The notice shall inform the property owner of the owner's right to exclude the owner's property from the incentive district if both of the following conditions are met: (i) The owner's entire parcel of property will not be located within the overlay. (ii) The owner has submitted a statement to the board of county commissioners of the county in which the parcel is located indicating the owner's intent to seek a tax exemption for improvements to the owner's parcel under division (A) or (B) of section 5709.78 of the Revised Code within the next five years. When both of the preceding conditions are met, the owner may exclude the owner's property from the incentive district by submitting a written response in accordance with division (C)(2)(b) of this section. The notice also shall include information detailing the required contents of the response, the address to which the response may be mailed, and the deadline for submitting the response. (b) Any owner of real property located within the boundaries of an incentive district proposed under division (C)(1) of this section who meets the conditions specified in divisions (C)(2)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section may exclude the property from the proposed incentive district by submitting a written response to the board not later than forty-five days after the postmark date on the notice required under division (C)(2)(a) of this section. The response shall include a copy of the statement submitted under division (C)(2)(a)(ii) of this section. The response shall be sent by first class mail or delivered in person at a public hearing held by the board under division (C)(2)(a) of this section. The response shall conform to any content requirements that may be established by the board and included in the notice provided under division (C)(2)(a) of this section. In the response, property owners may identify a parcel by street address, by the manner in which it is identified in the resolution, or by other means allowing the identity of the parcel to be ascertained. (c) Before adopting a resolution under division (C)(1) of this section, the board shall amend the resolution to exclude any parcel for which a written response has been submitted under division (C)(2)(b) of this section. A township shall not apply for exemptions from taxation under section 5709.911 of the Revised Code for any such parcel, and service payments may not be required from the owner of the parcel. Improvements to a parcel excluded from an incentive district under this division may be exempted from taxation under division (B) of this section pursuant to a resolution adopted under that division or under any other section of the Revised Code under which the parcel qualifies. (3)(a) A resolution adopted under division (C)(1) of this section shall specify the life of the incentive district and the percentage of the improvements to be exempted, shall designate the public infrastructure improvements made, to be made, or in the process of being made, that benefit or serve, or, once made, will benefit or serve parcels in the district. The resolution also shall identify one or more specific projects being, or to be, undertaken in the district that place additional demand on the public infrastructure improvements designated in the resolution. The project identified may, but need not be, the project under division (C)(3)(b) of this section that places real property in use for commercial or industrial purposes. A resolution adopted under division (C)(1) of this section on or after March 30, 2006, shall not designate police or fire equipment as public infrastructure improvements, and, except as provided in division (F) of this section, no service payment provided for in section 5709.74 of the Revised Code and received by the township under the resolution shall be used for police or fire equipment. (b) A resolution adopted under division (C)(1) of this section may authorize the use of service payments provided for in section 5709.74 of the Revised Code for the purpose of housing renovations within the incentive district, provided that the resolution also designates public infrastructure improvements that benefit or serve the district, and that a project within the district places real property in use for commercial or industrial purposes. Service payments may be used to finance or support loans, deferred loans, and grants to persons for the purpose of housing renovations within the district. The resolution shall designate the parcels within the district that are eligible for housing renovations. The resolution shall state separately the amount or the percentages of the expected aggregate service payments that are designated for each public infrastructure improvement and for the purpose of housing renovations. (4) Except with the approval of the board of education of each city, local, or exempted village school district within the territory of which the incentive district is or will be located, and subject to division (E) of this section, the life of an incentive district shall not exceed ten years, and the percentage of improvements to be exempted shall not exceed seventy-five per cent. With approval of the board of education, the life of a district may be not more than thirty years, and the percentage of improvements to be exempted may be not more than one hundred per cent. The approval of a board of education shall be obtained in the manner provided in division (D) of this section. (D) Improvements with respect to a parcel may be exempted from taxation under division (B) of this section, and improvements to parcels within an incentive district may be exempted from taxation under division (C) of this section, for up to ten years or, with the approval of the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district within which the parcel or district is located, for up to thirty years. The percentage of the improvements exempted from taxation may, with such approval, exceed seventy-five per cent, but shall not exceed one hundred per cent. Not later than forty-five business days prior to adopting a resolution under this section declaring improvements to be a public purpose that is subject to approval by a board of education under this division, the board of township trustees shall deliver to the board of education a notice stating its intent to adopt a resolution making that declaration. The notice regarding improvements with respect to a parcel under division (B) of this section shall identify the parcels for which improvements are to be exempted from taxation, provide an estimate of the true value in money of the improvements, specify the period for which the improvements would be exempted from taxation and the percentage of the improvements that would be exempted, and indicate the date on which the board of township trustees intends to adopt the resolution. The notice regarding improvements made under division (C) of this section to parcels within an incentive district shall delineate the boundaries of the district, specifically identify each parcel within the district, identify each anticipated improvement in the district, provide an estimate of the true value in money of each such improvement, specify the life of the district and the percentage of improvements that would be exempted, and indicate the date on which the board of township trustees intends to adopt the resolution. The board of education, by resolution adopted by a majority of the board, may approve the exemption for the period or for the exemption percentage specified in the notice; may disapprove the exemption for the number of years in excess of ten, may disapprove the exemption for the percentage of the improvements to be exempted in excess of seventy-five per cent, or both; or may approve the exemption on the condition that the board of township trustees and the board of education negotiate an agreement providing for compensation to the school district equal in value to a percentage of the amount of taxes exempted in the eleventh and subsequent years of the exemption period or, in the case of exemption percentages in excess of seventy-five per cent, compensation equal in value to a percentage of the taxes that would be payable on the portion of the improvements in excess of seventy-five per cent were that portion to be subject to taxation, or other mutually agreeable compensation. The board of education shall certify its resolution to the board of township trustees not later than fourteen days prior to the date the board of township trustees intends to adopt the resolution as indicated in the notice. If the board of education and the board of township trustees negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement, the resolution may declare the improvements a public purpose for the number of years specified in the resolution or, in the case of exemption percentages in excess of seventy-five per cent, for the exemption percentage specified in the resolution. In either case, if the board of education and the board of township trustees fail to negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement, the resolution may declare the improvements a public purpose for not more than ten years, and shall not exempt more than seventy-five per cent of the improvements from taxation. If the board of education fails to certify a resolution to the board of township trustees within the time prescribed by this section, the board of township trustees thereupon may adopt the resolution and may declare the improvements a public purpose for up to thirty years or, in the case of exemption percentages proposed in excess of seventy-five per cent, for the exemption percentage specified in the resolution. The board of township trustees may adopt the resolution at any time after the board of education certifies its resolution approving the exemption to the board of township trustees, or, if the board of education approves the exemption on the condition that a mutually acceptable compensation agreement be negotiated, at any time after the compensation agreement is agreed to by the board of education and the board of township trustees. If a mutually acceptable compensation agreement is negotiated between the board of township trustees and the board of education, including agreements for payments in lieu of taxes under section 5709.74 of the Revised Code, the board of township trustees shall compensate the joint vocational school district within which the parcel or district is located at the same rate and under the same terms received by the city, local, or exempted village school district. If a board of education has adopted a resolution waiving its right to approve exemptions from taxation under this section and the resolution remains in effect, approval of such exemptions by the board of education is not required under division (D) of this section. If a board of education has adopted a resolution allowing a board of township trustees to deliver the notice required under division (D) of this section fewer than forty-five business days prior to adoption of the resolution by the board of township trustees, the board of township trustees shall deliver the notice to the board of education not later than the number of days prior to the adoption as prescribed by the board of education in its resolution. If a board of education adopts a resolution waiving its right to approve exemptions or shortening the notification period, the board of education shall certify a copy of the resolution to the board of township trustees. If the board of education rescinds the resolution, it shall certify notice of the rescission to the board of township trustees. If the board of township trustees is not required by division (D) of this section to notify the board of education of the board of township trustees' intent to declare improvements to be a public purpose, the board of township trustees shall comply with the notice requirements imposed under section 5709.83 of the Revised Code before taking formal action to adopt the resolution making that declaration, unless the board of education has adopted a resolution under that section waiving its right to receive the notice. Nothing in this division prohibits the board of township trustees from amending the resolution under section 5709.51 or 5709.511 of the Revised Code to extend the term of the exemption. (E)(1) If a proposed resolution under division (C)(1) of this section exempts improvements with respect to a parcel within an incentive district for more than ten years, or the percentage of the improvement exempted from taxation exceeds seventy-five per cent, not later than forty-five business days prior to adopting the resolution the board of township trustees shall deliver to the board of county commissioners of the county within which the incentive district is or will be located a notice that states its intent to adopt a resolution creating an incentive district. The notice shall include a copy of the proposed resolution, identify the parcels for which improvements are to be exempted from taxation, provide an estimate of the true value in money of the improvements, specify the period of time for which the improvements would be exempted from taxation, specify the percentage of the improvements that would be exempted from taxation, and indicate the date on which the board of township trustees intends to adopt the resolution. (2) The board of county commissioners, by resolution adopted by a majority of the board, may object to the exemption for the number of years in excess of ten, may object to the exemption for the percentage of the improvement to be exempted in excess of seventy-five per cent, or both. If the board of county commissioners objects, the board may negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement with the board of township trustees. In no case shall the compensation provided to the board of county commissioners exceed the property taxes foregone due to the exemption. If the board of county commissioners objects, and the board of county commissioners and board of township trustees fail to negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement, the resolution adopted under division (C)(1) of this section shall provide to the board of county commissioners compensation in the eleventh and subsequent years of the exemption period equal in value to not more than fifty per cent of the taxes that would be payable to the county or, if the board of county commissioner's objection includes an objection to an exemption percentage in excess of seventy-five per cent, compensation equal in value to not more than fifty per cent of the taxes that would be payable to the county, on the portion of the improvement in excess of seventy-five per cent, were that portion to be subject to taxation. The board of county commissioners shall certify its resolution to the board of township trustees not later than thirty days after receipt of the notice. (3) If the board of county commissioners does not object or fails to certify its resolution objecting to an exemption within thirty days after receipt of the notice, the board of township trustees may adopt its resolution, and no compensation shall be provided to the board of county commissioners. If the board of county commissioners timely certifies its resolution objecting to the trustees' resolution, the board of township trustees may adopt its resolution at any time after a mutually acceptable compensation agreement is agreed to by the board of county commissioners and the board of township trustees, or, if no compensation agreement is negotiated, at any time after the board of township trustees agrees in the proposed resolution to provide compensation to the board of county commissioners of fifty per cent of the taxes that would be payable to the county in the eleventh and subsequent years of the exemption period or on the portion of the improvement in excess of seventy-five per cent, were that portion to be subject to taxation. (F) Service payments in lieu of taxes that are attributable to any amount by which the effective tax rate of either a renewal levy with an increase or a replacement levy exceeds the effective tax rate of the levy renewed or replaced, or that are attributable to an additional levy, for a levy authorized by the voters for any of the following purposes on or after January 1, 2006, and which are provided pursuant to a resolution creating an incentive district under division (C)(1) of this section that is adopted on or after January 1, 2006, or a later date as specified in this division, shall be distributed to the appropriate taxing authority as required under division (C) of section 5709.74 of the Revised Code in an amount equal to the amount of taxes from that additional levy or from the increase in the effective tax rate of such renewal or replacement levy that would have been payable to that taxing authority from the following levies were it not for the exemption authorized under division (C) of this section: (1) A tax levied under division (L) of section 5705.19 or section 5705.191 or 5705.222 of the Revised Code for community developmental disabilities programs and services pursuant to Chapter 5126. of the Revised Code; (2) A tax levied under division (Y) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code for providing or maintaining senior citizens services or facilities; (3) A tax levied under section 5705.22 of the Revised Code for county hospitals; (4) A tax levied by a joint-county district or by a county under section 5705.19, 5705.191, or 5705.221 of the Revised Code for alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or families; (5) A tax levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code for library purposes; (6) A tax levied under section 5705.24 of the Revised Code for the support of children services and the placement and care of children; (7) A tax levied under division (Z) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code for the provision and maintenance of zoological park services and facilities under section 307.76 of the Revised Code; (8) A tax levied under section 511.27 or division (H) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code for the support of township park districts; (9) A tax levied under division (A), (F), or (H) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code for parks and recreational purposes of a joint recreation district organized pursuant to division (B) of section 755.14 of the Revised Code; (10) A tax levied under section 1545.20 or 1545.21 of the Revised Code for park district purposes; (11) A tax levied under section 5705.191 of the Revised Code for the purpose of making appropriations for public assistance; human or social services; public relief; public welfare; public health and hospitalization; and support of general hospitals; (12) A tax levied under section 3709.29 of the Revised Code for a general health district program; (13) A tax levied by a township under section 505.39, 505.51, or division (I), (J), (U), or (JJ) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code for the purpose of funding fire, police, emergency medical, or ambulance services as described in those sections or by a township fire district. Division (F)(13) of this section applies only to incentive districts created by a resolution adopted on or after March 22, 2019, the effective date of the amendment of this section by H.B. 500 of the 132nd general assembly, and only if that if the resolution adopted under division (C) of this section specifies that division (F) of this section shall apply to such a tax. (14) A tax levied by a joint fire district, fire and ambulance district, joint ambulance district, or joint emergency medical services district. (G) An exemption from taxation granted under this section commences with the tax year specified in the resolution so long as the year specified in the resolution commences after the effective date of the resolution. If the resolution specifies a year commencing before the effective date of the resolution or specifies no year whatsoever, the exemption commences with the tax year in which an exempted improvement first appears on the tax list and duplicate of real and public utility property and that commences after the effective date of the resolution. In lieu of stating a specific year, the resolution may provide that the exemption commences in the tax year in which the value of an improvement exceeds a specified amount or in which the construction of one or more improvements is completed, provided that such tax year commences after the effective date of the resolution. With respect to the exemption of improvements to parcels under division (B) of this section, the resolution may allow for the exemption to commence in different tax years on a parcel-by-parcel basis, with a separate exemption term specified for each parcel. Except as otherwise provided in this division and sections 5709.51 and 5709.511 of the Revised Code, the exemption ends on the date specified in the resolution as the date the improvement ceases to be a public purpose or the incentive district expires, or ends on the date on which the public infrastructure improvements and housing renovations are paid in full from the township public improvement tax increment equivalent fund established under section 5709.75 of the Revised Code, whichever occurs first. The exemption of an improvement with respect to a parcel or within an incentive district may end on a later date, as specified in the resolution, if the board of township trustees and the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district within which the parcel or district is located have entered into a compensation agreement under section 5709.82 of the Revised Code with respect to the improvement and the board of education has approved the term of the exemption under division (D) of this section, but in no case shall the improvement be exempted from taxation for more than thirty years. The board of township trustees may, by majority vote, adopt a resolution permitting the township to enter into such agreements as the board finds necessary or appropriate to provide for the construction or undertaking of public infrastructure improvements and housing renovations. Any exemption shall be claimed and allowed in the same or a similar manner as in the case of other real property exemptions. If an exemption status changes during a tax year, the procedure for the apportionment of the taxes for that year is the same as in the case of other changes in tax exemption status during the year. (H) The board of township trustees may issue the notes of the township to finance all costs pertaining to the construction or undertaking of public infrastructure improvements and housing renovations made pursuant to this section. The notes shall be signed by the board and attested by the signature of the township fiscal officer, shall bear interest not to exceed the rate provided in section 9.95 of the Revised Code, and are not subject to Chapter 133. of the Revised Code. The resolution authorizing the issuance of the notes shall pledge the funds of the township public improvement tax increment equivalent fund established pursuant to section 5709.75 of the Revised Code to pay the interest on and principal of the notes. The notes, which may contain a clause permitting prepayment at the option of the board, shall be offered for sale on the open market or given to the vendor or contractor if no sale is made. (I) The township, not later than fifteen days after the adoption of a resolution under this section, shall submit to the director of development a copy of the resolution. On or before the thirty-first day of March of each year, the township shall submit a status report to the director. The report shall indicate, in the manner prescribed by the director, the progress of the project during each year that the exemption remains in effect, including a summary of the receipts from service payments in lieu of taxes; expenditures of money from the fund created under section 5709.75 of the Revised Code; a description of the public infrastructure improvements and housing renovations financed with the expenditures; and a quantitative summary of changes in private investment resulting from each project. (J) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a board of township trustees from declaring to be a public purpose improvements with respect to more than one parcel. If a parcel is located in a new community district in which the new community authority imposes a community development charge on the basis of rentals received from leases of real property as described in division (L)(2) of section 349.01 of the Revised Code, the parcel may not be exempted from taxation under this section. (K) A board of township trustees that adopted a resolution under this section prior to July 21, 1994, may amend that resolution to include any additional public infrastructure improvement. A board of township trustees that seeks by the amendment to utilize money from its township public improvement tax increment equivalent fund for land acquisition in aid of industry, commerce, distribution, or research, demolition on private property, or stormwater and flood remediation projects may do so provided that the board currently is a party to a hold-harmless agreement with the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district within the territory of which are located the parcels that are subject to an exemption. For the purposes of this division, a "hold-harmless agreement" means an agreement under which the board of township trustees agrees to compensate the school district for one hundred per cent of the tax revenue that the school district would have received from further improvements to parcels designated in the resolution were it not for the exemption granted by the resolution. (L)(1) Notwithstanding the limitation prescribed by division (D) of this section on the number of years that improvements to a parcel or parcels may be exempted from taxation, and subject to division (L)(3) of this section, a board of trustees of a township with a population of fifteen thousand or more may amend a resolution originally adopted under this section before December 31, 1994, to extend the exemption of improvements to the parcel or parcels included in such resolution for an additional period not to exceed fifteen years. The amendment shall not increase the percentage of improvements to the parcel or parcels exempted from taxation. (2) Notwithstanding the limitations prescribed by divisions (C) and (D) of this section on the life of an incentive district and the number of years that improvements to a parcel or parcels within an incentive district may be exempted from taxation, and subject to division (L)(3) of this section, a board of township trustees may amend a resolution originally adopted under division (C) of this section before January 1, 2006, to extend the life of an incentive district created by that resolution. The extension shall be for a period not to exceed fifteen years and shall not increase the percentage of the value of improvements exempted from taxation. (3) Before adopting an amendment authorized under division (L)(1) or (2) of this section, the board of township trustees shall provide notice of the amendment to each board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district in which the exempted parcels or incentive district are located, in the same manner as provided under division (D) of this section, and shall obtain the approval of each such board of education in the manner required under that division, except that (a) the board of education may approve the exemption on the condition that the board of township trustees and the board of education negotiate an agreement providing for compensation to the school district equal in value to the amount of taxes the district forgoes in each year the exemption is extended or any other mutually agreeable compensation and (b) if the board of education fails to certify a resolution approving the amendment to the board of township trustees within the time prescribed by division (D) of this section, the board of township trustees shall not adopt the amendment. No approval under division (L)(3) of this section shall be required for an amendment authorized under division (L)(2) of this section if the amendment provides for compensation to the city, local, or exempted village school district in which the incentive district is located equal in value to the amount of taxes that would be payable to the school district if the improvements exempted from taxation had not been exempted for the additional period. Approval is also not required for an amendment authorized under either division (L)(1) or (2) of this section from a board of education that has adopted a resolution waiving its right to approve exemptions from taxation pursuant to division (D) of this section. If the board of education has adopted such a resolution, the board of township trustees shall comply with the notice requirements imposed under section 5709.83 of the Revised Code before taking formal action to adopt the amendment unless the board of education has adopted a resolution under that section waiving its right to receive the notice. Not later than fourteen days before adopting an amendment authorized under division (L)(1) or (2) of this section, the board of township trustees shall deliver a notice identical to a notice required under section 5709.83 of the Revised Code to the board of county commissioners of each county in which the exempted parcels or incentive district are located. Sec. 5709.78. (A) A board of county commissioners may, by resolution, declare improvements to certain parcels of real property located in the unincorporated territory of the county to be a public purpose. Except as otherwise provided under division (C) of this section or section 5709.51 or 5709.511 of the Revised Code, not more than seventy-five per cent of an improvement thus declared to be a public purpose may be exempted from real property taxation, for a period of not more than ten years. The resolution shall specify the percentage of the improvement to be exempted and the life of the exemption. A resolution adopted under this division shall designate the specific public infrastructure improvements made, to be made, or in the process of being made by the county that directly benefit, or that once made will directly benefit, the parcels for which improvements are declared to be a public purpose. The service payments provided for in section 5709.79 of the Revised Code shall be used to finance the public infrastructure improvements designated in the resolution, or as provided in section 5709.80 of the Revised Code. Improvements exempted from taxation under division (A) of this section shall not be exempted from a qualifying fire or emergency medical services tax, as defined in section 5709.40 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) A board of county commissioners may adopt a resolution creating an incentive district and declaring improvements to parcels within the district to be a public purpose and, except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, exempt from taxation as provided in this section, but no board of county commissioners of a county that has a population that exceeds twenty-five thousand, as shown by the most recent federal decennial census, shall adopt a resolution that creates an incentive district if the sum of the taxable value of real property in the proposed district for the preceding tax year and the taxable value of all real property in the county that would have been taxable in the preceding year were it not for the fact that the property was in an existing incentive district and therefore exempt from taxation exceeds twenty-five per cent of the taxable value of real property in the county for the preceding tax year. The district shall be located within the unincorporated territory of the county and shall not include any territory that is included within a district created under division (C) of section 5709.73 of the Revised Code. The resolution shall delineate the boundary of the proposed district and specifically identify each parcel within the district. A proposed district may not include any parcel that is or has been exempted from taxation under division (A) of this section or that is or has been within another district created under this division. A resolution may create more than one such district, and more than one resolution may be adopted under division (B)(1) of this section. (2)(a) Not later than thirty days prior to adopting a resolution under division (B)(1) of this section, if the county intends to apply for exemptions from taxation under section 5709.911 of the Revised Code on behalf of owners of real property located within the proposed incentive district, the board of county commissioners shall conduct a public hearing on the proposed resolution. Not later than thirty days prior to the public hearing, the board shall give notice of the public hearing and the proposed resolution by first class mail to every real property owner whose property is located within the boundaries of the proposed incentive district that is the subject of the proposed resolution. The board also shall provide the notice by first class mail to the clerk of each township in which the proposed incentive district will be located. The notice shall include a map of the proposed incentive district on which the board of county commissioners shall have delineated an overlay. The notice shall inform property owners of the owner's right to exclude the owner's property from the incentive district if both of the following conditions are met: (i) The owner's entire parcel of property will not be located within the overlay. (ii) The owner has submitted a statement to the board of township trustees of the township in which the parcel is located indicating the owner's intent to seek a tax exemption for improvements to the owner's parcel under section 5709.41 or division (B) or (C) of section 5709.73 of the Revised Code within the next five years. When both of the preceding conditions are met, the owner may exclude the owner's property from the incentive district by submitting a written response in accordance with division (B)(2)(b) of this section. The notice also shall include information detailing the required contents of the response, the address to which the response may be mailed, and the deadline for submitting the response. (b) Any owner of real property located within the boundaries of an incentive district proposed under division (B) (1) of this section who meets the conditions specified in divisions (B)(2)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section may exclude the property from the proposed incentive district by submitting a written response to the board not later than forty-five days after the postmark date on the notice required under division (B)(2)(a) of this section. The response shall include a copy of the statement submitted under division (B)(2)(a)(ii) of this section. The response shall be sent by first class mail or delivered in person at a public hearing held by the board under division (B)(2)(a) of this section. The response shall conform to any content requirements that may be established by the board and included in the notice provided under division (B)(2)(a) of this section. In the response, property owners may identify a parcel by street address, by the manner in which it is identified in the resolution, or by other means allowing the identity of the parcel to be ascertained. (c) Before adopting a resolution under division (B)(1) of this section, the board shall amend the resolution to exclude any parcel for which a written response has been submitted under division (B)(2)(b) of this section. A county shall not apply for exemptions from taxation under section 5709.911 of the Revised Code for any such parcel, and service payments may not be required from the owner of the parcel. Improvements to a parcel excluded from an incentive district under this division may be exempted from taxation under division (A) of this section pursuant to a resolution adopted under that division or under any other section of the Revised Code under which the parcel qualifies. (3)(a) A resolution adopted under division (B)(1) of this section shall specify the life of the incentive district and the percentage of the improvements to be exempted, shall designate the public infrastructure improvements made, to be made, or in the process of being made, that benefit or serve, or, once made, will benefit or serve parcels in the district. The resolution also shall identify one or more specific projects being, or to be, undertaken in the district that place additional demand on the public infrastructure improvements designated in the resolution. The project identified may, but need not be, the project under division (B)(3)(b) of this section that places real property in use for commercial or industrial purposes. A resolution adopted under division (B)(1) of this section on or after March 30, 2006, shall not designate police or fire equipment as public infrastructure improvements, and no service payment provided for in section 5709.79 of the Revised Code and received by the county under the resolution shall be used for police or fire equipment. (b) A resolution adopted under division (B)(1) of this section may authorize the use of service payments provided for in section 5709.79 of the Revised Code for the purpose of housing renovations within the incentive district, provided that the resolution also designates public infrastructure improvements that benefit or serve the district, and that a project within the district places real property in use for commercial or industrial purposes. Service payments may be used to finance or support loans, deferred loans, and grants to persons for the purpose of housing renovations within the district. The resolution shall designate the parcels within the district that are eligible for housing renovations. The resolution shall state separately the amount or the percentages of the expected aggregate service payments that are designated for each public infrastructure improvement and for the purpose of housing renovations. (4) Except with the approval of the board of education of each city, local, or exempted village school district within the territory of which the incentive district is or will be located, and subject to division (D) of this section, the life of an incentive district shall not exceed ten years, and the percentage of improvements to be exempted shall not exceed seventy-five per cent. With approval of the board of education, the life of a district may be not more than thirty years, and the percentage of improvements to be exempted may be not more than one hundred per cent. The approval of a board of education shall be obtained in the manner provided in division (C) of this section. (C)(1) Improvements with respect to a parcel may be exempted from taxation under division (A) of this section, and improvements to parcels within an incentive district may be exempted from taxation under division (B) of this section, for up to ten years or, with the approval of the board of education of each city, local, or exempted village school district within which the parcel or district is located, for up to thirty years. The percentage of the improvements exempted from taxation may, with such approval, exceed seventy-five per cent, but shall not exceed one hundred per cent. Not later than forty-five business days prior to adopting a resolution under this section declaring improvements to be a public purpose that is subject to the approval of a board of education under this division, the board of county commissioners shall deliver to the board of education a notice stating its intent to adopt a resolution making that declaration. The notice regarding improvements with respect to a parcel under division (A) of this section shall identify the parcels for which improvements are to be exempted from taxation, provide an estimate of the true value in money of the improvements, specify the period for which the improvements would be exempted from taxation and the percentage of the improvements that would be exempted, and indicate the date on which the board of county commissioners intends to adopt the resolution. The notice regarding improvements to parcels within an incentive district under division (B) of this section shall delineate the boundaries of the district, specifically identify each parcel within the district, identify each anticipated improvement in the district, provide an estimate of the true value in money of each such improvement, specify the life of the district and the percentage of improvements that would be exempted, and indicate the date on which the board of county commissioners intends to adopt the resolution. The board of education, by resolution adopted by a majority of the board, may approve the exemption for the period or for the exemption percentage specified in the notice; may disapprove the exemption for the number of years in excess of ten, may disapprove the exemption for the percentage of the improvements to be exempted in excess of seventy-five per cent, or both; or may approve the exemption on the condition that the board of county commissioners and the board of education negotiate an agreement providing for compensation to the school district equal in value to a percentage of the amount of taxes exempted in the eleventh and subsequent years of the exemption period or, in the case of exemption percentages in excess of seventy-five per cent, compensation equal in value to a percentage of the taxes that would be payable on the portion of the improvements in excess of seventy-five per cent were that portion to be subject to taxation, or other mutually agreeable compensation. (2) The board of education shall certify its resolution to the board of county commissioners not later than fourteen days prior to the date the board of county commissioners intends to adopt its resolution as indicated in the notice. If the board of education and the board of county commissioners negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement, the resolution of the board of county commissioners may declare the improvements a public purpose for the number of years specified in that resolution or, in the case of exemption percentages in excess of seventy-five per cent, for the exemption percentage specified in the resolution. In either case, if the board of education and the board of county commissioners fail to negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement, the resolution may declare the improvements a public purpose for not more than ten years, and shall not exempt more than seventy-five per cent of the improvements from taxation. If the board of education fails to certify a resolution to the board of county commissioners within the time prescribed by this section, the board of county commissioners thereupon may adopt the resolution and may declare the improvements a public purpose for up to thirty years or, in the case of exemption percentages proposed in excess of seventy-five per cent, for the exemption percentage specified in the resolution. The board of county commissioners may adopt the resolution at any time after the board of education certifies its resolution approving the exemption to the board of county commissioners, or, if the board of education approves the exemption on the condition that a mutually acceptable compensation agreement be negotiated, at any time after the compensation agreement is agreed to by the board of education and the board of county commissioners. If a mutually acceptable compensation agreement is negotiated between the board of county commissioners and the board of education, including agreements for payments in lieu of taxes under section 5709.79 of the Revised Code, the board of county commissioners shall compensate the joint vocational school district within which the parcel or district is located at the same rate and under the same terms received by the city, local, or exempted village school district. (3) If a board of education has adopted a resolution waiving its right to approve exemptions from taxation under this section and the resolution remains in effect, approval of such exemptions by the board of education is not required under division (C) of this section. If a board of education has adopted a resolution allowing a board of county commissioners to deliver the notice required under division (C) of this section fewer than forty-five business days prior to approval of the resolution by the board of county commissioners, the board of county commissioners shall deliver the notice to the board of education not later than the number of days prior to such approval as prescribed by the board of education in its resolution. If a board of education adopts a resolution waiving its right to approve exemptions or shortening the notification period, the board of education shall certify a copy of the resolution to the board of county commissioners. If the board of education rescinds such a resolution, it shall certify notice of the rescission to the board of county commissioners. (4) Nothing in division (C) of this section prohibits the board of county commissioners from amending the resolution under section 5709.51 or 5709.511 of the Revised Code to extend the term of the exemption. (D)(1) If a proposed resolution under division (B)(1) of this section exempts improvements with respect to a parcel within an incentive district for more than ten years, or the percentage of the improvement exempted from taxation exceeds seventy-five per cent, not later than forty-five business days prior to adopting the resolution the board of county commissioners shall deliver to the board of township trustees of any township within which the incentive district is or will be located a notice that states its intent to adopt a resolution creating an incentive district. The notice shall include a copy of the proposed resolution, identify the parcels for which improvements are to be exempted from taxation, provide an estimate of the true value in money of the improvements, specify the period of time for which the improvements would be exempted from taxation, specify the percentage of the improvements that would be exempted from taxation, and indicate the date on which the board intends to adopt the resolution. (2) The board of township trustees, by resolution adopted by a majority of the board, may object to the exemption for the number of years in excess of ten, may object to the exemption for the percentage of the improvement to be exempted in excess of seventy-five per cent, or both. If the board of township trustees objects, the board of township trustees may negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement with the board of county commissioners. In no case shall the compensation provided to the board of township trustees exceed the property taxes forgone due to the exemption. If the board of township trustees objects, and the board of township trustees and the board of county commissioners fail to negotiate a mutually acceptable compensation agreement, the resolution adopted under division (B)(1) of this section shall provide to the board of township trustees compensation in the eleventh and subsequent years of the exemption period equal in value to not more than fifty per cent of the taxes that would be payable to the township or, if the board of township trustee's objection includes an objection to an exemption percentage in excess of seventy-five per cent, compensation equal in value to not more than fifty per cent of the taxes that would be payable to the township on the portion of the improvement in excess of seventy-five per cent, were that portion to be subject to taxation. The board of township trustees shall certify its resolution to the board of county commissioners not later than thirty days after receipt of the notice. (3) If the board of township trustees does not object or fails to certify a resolution objecting to an exemption within thirty days after receipt of the notice, the board of county commissioners may adopt its resolution, and no compensation shall be provided to the board of township trustees. If the board of township trustees certifies its resolution objecting to the commissioners' resolution, the board of county commissioners may adopt its resolution at any time after a mutually acceptable compensation agreement is agreed to by the board of county commissioners and the board of township trustees. If the board of township trustees certifies a resolution objecting to the commissioners' resolution, the board of county commissioners may adopt its resolution at any time after a mutually acceptable compensation agreement is agreed to by the board of county commissioners and the board of township trustees, or, if no compensation agreement is negotiated, at any time after the board of county commissioners in the proposed resolution to provide compensation to the board of township trustees of fifty per cent of the taxes that would be payable to the township in the eleventh and subsequent years of the exemption period or on the portion of the improvement in excess of seventy-five per cent, were that portion to be subject to taxation. (E) Service payments in lieu of taxes that are attributable to any amount by which the effective tax rate of either a renewal levy with an increase or a replacement levy exceeds the effective tax rate of the levy renewed or replaced, or that are attributable to an additional levy, for a levy authorized by the voters for any of the following purposes on or after January 1, 2006, and which are provided pursuant to a resolution creating an incentive district under division (B)(1) of this section that is adopted on or after January 1, 2006, shall be distributed to the appropriate taxing authority as required under division (D) of section 5709.79 of the Revised Code in an amount equal to the amount of taxes from that additional levy or from the increase in the effective tax rate of such renewal or replacement levy that would have been payable to that taxing authority from the following levies were it not for the exemption authorized under division (B) of this section: (1) A tax levied under division (L) of section 5705.19 or section 5705.191 or 5705.222 of the Revised Code for community developmental disabilities programs and services pursuant to Chapter 5126. of the Revised Code; (2) A tax levied under division (Y) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code for providing or maintaining senior citizens services or facilities; (3) A tax levied under section 5705.22 of the Revised Code for county hospitals; (4) A tax levied by a joint-county district or by a county under section 5705.19, 5705.191, or 5705.221 of the Revised Code for alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or facilities; (5) A tax levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code for library purposes; (6) A tax levied under section 5705.24 of the Revised Code for the support of children services and the placement and care of children; (7) A tax levied under division (Z) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code for the provision and maintenance of zoological park services and facilities under section 307.76 of the Revised Code; (8) A tax levied under section 511.27 or division (H) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code for the support of township park districts; (9) A tax levied under division (A), (F), or (H) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code for parks and recreational purposes of a joint recreation district organized pursuant to division (B) of section 755.14 of the Revised Code; (10) A tax levied under section 1545.20 or 1545.21 of the Revised Code for park district purposes; (11) A tax levied under section 5705.191 of the Revised Code for the purpose of making appropriations for public assistance; human or social services; public relief; public welfare; public health and hospitalization; and support of general hospitals; (12) A tax levied under section 3709.29 of the Revised Code for a general health district program; (13) A qualifying fire or emergency medical services tax, as defined in section 5709.40 of the Revised Code. (F) An exemption from taxation granted under this section commences with the tax year specified in the resolution so long as the year specified in the resolution commences after the effective date of the resolution. If the resolution specifies a year commencing before the effective date of the resolution or specifies no year whatsoever, the exemption commences with the tax year in which an exempted improvement first appears on the tax list and duplicate of real and public utility property and that commences after the effective date of the resolution. In lieu of stating a specific year, the resolution may provide that the exemption commences in the tax year in which the value of an improvement exceeds a specified amount or in which the construction of one or more improvements is completed, provided that such tax year commences after the effective date of the resolution. With respect to the exemption of improvements to parcels under division (A) of this section, the resolution may allow for the exemption to commence in different tax years on a parcel-by-parcel basis, with a separate exemption term specified for each parcel. Except as otherwise provided in this division, the exemption ends on the date specified in the resolution as the date the improvement ceases to be a public purpose or the incentive district expires, or ends on the date on which the county can no longer require annual service payments in lieu of taxes under section 5709.79 of the Revised Code, whichever occurs first. The exemption of an improvement with respect to a parcel or within an incentive district may end on a later date, as specified in the resolution, if the board of commissioners and the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district within which the parcel or district is located have entered into a compensation agreement under section 5709.82 of the Revised Code with respect to the improvement, and the board of education has approved the term of the exemption under division (C)(1) of this section, but in no case shall the improvement be exempted from taxation for more than thirty years. Exemptions shall be claimed and allowed in the same or a similar manner as in the case of other real property exemptions. If an exemption status changes during a tax year, the procedure for the apportionment of the taxes for that year is the same as in the case of other changes in tax exemption status during the year. (G) If the board of county commissioners is not required by this section to notify the board of education of the board of county commissioners' intent to declare improvements to be a public purpose, the board of county commissioners shall comply with the notice requirements imposed under section 5709.83 of the Revised Code before taking formal action to adopt the resolution making that declaration, unless the board of education has adopted a resolution under that section waiving its right to receive such a notice. (H) The county, not later than fifteen days after the adoption of a resolution under this section, shall submit to the director of development a copy of the resolution. On or before the thirty-first day of March of each year, the county shall submit a status report to the director. The report shall indicate, in the manner prescribed by the director, the progress of the project during each year that an exemption remains in effect, including a summary of the receipts from service payments in lieu of taxes; expenditures of money from the fund created under section 5709.80 of the Revised Code; a description of the public infrastructure improvements and housing renovations financed with such expenditures; and a quantitative summary of changes in employment and private investment resulting from each project. (I) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a board of county commissioners from declaring to be a public purpose improvements with respect to more than one parcel. (J) If a parcel is located in a new community district in which the new community authority imposes a community development charge on the basis of rentals received from leases of real property as described in division (L)(2) of section 349.01 of the Revised Code, the parcel may not be exempted from taxation under this section. Section 2. That existing sections 3735.67, 5709.40, 5709.41, 5709.73, and 5709.78 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The amendment by this act of sections 5709.40, 5709.41, 5709.73, and 5709.78 applies to exemptions authorized in ordinances or resolutions adopted under those sections on or after the effective date of this section.